Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4705.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2006, chapter 259, article 3, section 10, subdivision 3, as amended by Laws 2014, chapter 308, article 3, section 24, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Use of revenues. (a) Revenues received from the taxes authorized by subdivisions 1 and 2 must be used to pay the cost of collecting and administering the tax and to finance the acquisition and betterment of water and wastewater facilities to serve the cities of Brainerd and Baxter, building and equipping a fire substation, as approved by the voters at the referendum authorizing the tax. Authorized costs include, but are not limited to, acquiring property and paying construction and engineering costs related to the projects. (b) In addition to the projects authorized in paragraph (a), the city of Baxter may, if approved by the voters at an election under subdivision 5, paragraph (b), allocate up to an additional $40,000,000 of the revenues received from the taxes authorized by subdivisions 1 and 2 to a capital infrastructure fund. Money from this fund may only be used to finance (1) sanitary sewer, storm sewer, and water projects, (2) transportation safety improvements, and (3) improvements to the Brainerd Lakes Area Airport. new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), in addition to the projects authorized in paragraphs (a) and (b), the city of Baxter may, if approved by the voters at an election as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, allocate the revenues received from the taxes authorized by subdivisions 1 and 2 to pay for projects in the city, including the costs of collecting and administering the tax and securing and paying debt service on bonds issued to finance all or part of the following projects, including property acquisition: new text end new text begin (1) $51,000,000 for upgrades and improvements to the water and wastewater utility systems; new text end new text begin (2) $16,000,000 for improvements to street infrastructure and safety improvements to streets affected by regional Highways 371 and 210; and new text end new text begin (3) $10,000,000 for construction of a new public safety facility. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Baxter and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 2. Laws 2006, chapter 259, article 3, section 10, subdivision 4, as amended by Laws 2014, chapter 308, article 3, section 25, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Bonds. (a) The city of Baxter, pursuant to the approval of the voters at the November 2, 2004, referendum authorizing the imposition of the taxes in this section, may issue general obligation bonds of the city, in one or more series, in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed $15,000,000 to finance the projects listed in subdivision 3, paragraph (a). The debt represented by the bonds is not included in computing any debt limitations applicable to the city, and the levy of taxes required by Minnesota Statutes, section 475.61, to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds is not subject to any levy limitation or included in computing or applying any levy limitation applicable to the city of Baxter. (b) The city of Baxter, pursuant to the approval of the voters at the 2014 general election to extend the tax under this section, may issue general obligation bonds of the city, in one or more series, in the aggregate principal amount not to exceed (1) $32,000,000 plus an amount equal to the costs of issuance of the bonds to finance the projects listed in subdivision 3, paragraph (b), clauses (1) and (2), and (2) $8,000,000 plus an amount equal to the costs of the issuance of the bonds to finance the project listed in subdivision 3, paragraph (b), clause (3). The debt represented by the bonds is not included in computing any debt limitations applicable to the city, and the levy of taxes required by Minnesota Statutes, section 475.61, to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds is not subject to any levy limitation or included in computing or applying any levy limitation applicable to the city of Baxter. new text begin (c) The city of Baxter may issue bonds under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 475, to finance all or a portion of the costs of the projects authorized in subdivision 3, paragraph (c), and approved by voters as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (a). The aggregate principal amount of bonds issued for this purpose must not exceed $77,000,000, plus an amount applied to the payment of costs of issuing the bonds. The bonds may be issued as general obligations of the city and may be paid from or secured by any funds available to the city, including the tax authorized under subdivision 1. The issuance of bonds under this subdivision is not subject to Minnesota Statutes, sections 275.60 and 275.61. The bonds are not included in computing any debt limitation applicable to the city. Any levy of taxes under Minnesota Statutes, section 475.61, to pay principal of and interest on the bonds is not subject to any levy limitation. A separate election to approve the bonds under Minnesota Statutes, section 475.58, is not required. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Baxter and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 3. Laws 2006, chapter 259, article 3, section 10, subdivision 5, as amended by Laws 2014, chapter 308, article 3, section 26, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Termination of taxes. (a) The taxes imposed under subdivisions 1 and 2 expire at the earlier of a date 12 years after the imposition of the tax or when the Baxter City Council first determines that the amount of revenues raised from the taxes to pay for the projects under subdivision 3 equals or exceeds $15,000,000 plus any interest on bonds issued for the projects under subdivision 4, paragraph (a). Any funds remaining after the expiration of the taxes and retirement of the bonds shall be placed in a capital project fund of the city of Baxter. The taxes imposed under subdivisions 1 and 2 may expire at an earlier time if the city of Baxter so determines by ordinance. (b) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 297A.99 and 477A.016, or any other contrary provision of law, ordinance, or city charter, the city of Baxter may, by ordinance, extend the taxes authorized under subdivisions 1 and 2 beyond the termination date in paragraph (a) if approved by the voters of the city at a general election held in 2014. The question put to the voters must indicate that an affirmative vote would extend the imposition of the taxes through 2037 or until an additional $40,000,000, plus an amount equal to interest and issuance costs associated with bonds issued under subdivision 4, paragraph (b), above the initial amount authorized to pay for $15,000,000 in bonds and associated bond cost and projects, listed in subdivision 3, paragraph (a), is raised. If extended under this paragraph, the taxes authorized in subdivisions 1 and 2 will terminate at the earlier of (1) when an additional $40,000,000, plus an amount equal to interest and issuance costs associated with bonds issued under subdivision 4, paragraph (b), above the amount authorized under paragraph (a), is raised, or (2) December 31, 2037. new text begin (c) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 297A.99 and 477A.016, or any other contrary provision of law, ordinance, or city charter, the city of Baxter may, by ordinance, extend the taxes authorized under subdivisions 1 and 2 beyond the termination date in paragraph (a) if approved by the voters as required under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.99, subdivision 3, paragraph (a). If extended under this paragraph, the taxes authorized in subdivisions 1 and 2 will terminate at the earlier of (1) when an additional $77,000,000, plus an amount equal to interest and issuance costs associated with bonds issued under subdivision 4, paragraph (c), above the amount authorized under paragraphs (a) and (b), is raised, or (2) 20 years after the tax is extended. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Baxter and its chief clerical officer comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end